Utah statutes.
72-1-209.   Department to cooperate in programs relating to scenic centers.
The department shall cooperate in planning and promoting road-building
programs into the scenic centers of the state and in providing camping grounds
and facilities in scenic centers for tourists with:
(1)  the Governor's Office of Economic Development;
(2)  other states;
(3)  all national, state, and local planning and zoning agencies and boards;
(4)  municipal and county officials; and
(5)  other agencies.
